Utah statutes.
31A-9-102.   Scope and purposes.

(1) (a)  This chapter applies to all fraternals organized under the laws of this state.

(b)  Except as expressly provided in this chapter and in Section 31A-14-210, this chapter does not apply to nondomestic fraternals.

(2)  The purposes of this chapter include:

(a)  providing a complete, self-contained procedure for the formation of fraternals;

(b)  assuring the solidity of fraternals by providing an organizational framework to facilitate sound management, operation, and regulation;

(c)  strengthening internal fraternal democracy through member participation; and

(d)  encouraging the fulfillment of the special purposes of fraternals.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

